District of Columbia statutes.
7-1501.02

Penalties; prosecutions.

(a)

Any person violating any provision of this subchapter or any regulation made pursuant to this subchapter shall be fined not more than $5,000, or be imprisoned for not more than 6 months, or both.

(b)

Prosecution for violations of this subchapter and regulations made pursuant to this subchapter shall be brought in the name of the District of Columbia upon information by the Corporation Counsel.

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-189, § 3, 32 DCR 931
1981 Ed., § 6-2602.